Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1281.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1289.16, as


amended by Section 3, Chapter 261, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 1289.16), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1289.16.


FELONY POINTING FIREARMS


A. It shall be lawful to point a firearm, knife, or any other


deadly weapon at another person or persons by:


1. A person who can legally own or possess a weapon pursuant to


the provisions of Section 1272 of this title:


a. during an act of self-defense, or


b. in defense of real or private property, whether owned,


leased, or occupied by permission of the property

Req. No. 3372 Page 1


owner and whether or not the person possesses a valid


handgun license issued pursuant to the Oklahoma Self-


Defense Act;


2. A person in the defensive display of a firearm or other


deadly weapon, as provided for in Section 1289.25 of this title;


3. Law enforcement authorities in the performance of their


duties;


4. Armed security guards licensed by the Council on Law


Enforcement Education and Training pursuant to the Oklahoma Security


Guard and Private Investigator Act in the performance of their


duties;


5. Members of the state military forces in the performance of


their duties;


6. Members of the federal military reserve and active military


components in the performance of their duties;


7. Any federal government law enforcement officer in the


performance of any duty; or


8. Any person during the performance of a play on stage, while


participating in a rodeo, or when participating in a television


program or film project; or


9. A person in possession of a valid handgun license issued


pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act.


B. It shall be unlawful for any person to willfully and without


lawful cause point a firearm, knife, or any other deadly weapon,

Req. No. 3372 Page 2


whether loaded or not, at any person or persons for the purpose of


threatening or with the intention of discharging the firearm or with


any malice or for any purpose of injuring, either through physical


injury or mental or emotional intimidation, or for purposes of


whimsy, humor, or prank, or in anger or otherwise.


C. Any person convicted of a violation of the provisions of


this section shall be punished as provided in Section 1289.17 of


this title.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3372 CN 12/19/2025 8:37:18 AM



























Req. No. 3372 Page 3